Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 11 Gold and Silver Products

6-11-1.
Mislabeling of gold products as to fineness — Brazing or uniting alloys.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who or which makes for sale or sells, or offers to sell or dispose of, or has in his, her, or its possession with intent to sell or dispose of, any article of merchandise made in whole or in part of gold or any alloy of gold, and having stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon any part the article, or upon any tag, card, or label attached to the article, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed, any mark indicating, or designed or intended to indicate, that the gold or alloy of gold in the article is of a greater degree of fineness than the actual fineness or quality of the gold or alloy, unless the actual fineness of the gold or alloy, in the case of flatware and watch cases, not less by more than three one-thousandths (3/1000) parts, and in the case of all other articles, not less by more than one-half (1/2) karat, than the fineness indicated by the mark stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon any part of the article, or upon any tag, card, or label attached to the article, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed, according to the standards and subject to the qualifications prescribed by this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

In any test for the ascertainment of the fineness of the gold or its alloy in any article, according to the tests and standards prescribed in this section, the part of the gold or of its alloy taken for the test, analysis, or assay shall be a part or portion that does not contain or have attached to it any solder or alloy of inferior fineness used for brazing or uniting the parts of the article; provided, in addition to the previously mentioned tests and standards, that the actual fineness of the entire quantity of gold and of its alloys contained in any article mentioned in this section (except watch cases and flatware), including all solder or alloy of inferior metal used for brazing or uniting the parts of the article (all gold, alloys, and solder being assayed as one piece), shall not be less by more than one karat than the fineness indicated by the mark stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon the article, or upon any tag, card, or label attached to the article, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1454, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 199, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 226, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 399, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-11-1

.

6-11-2.
Labeling of gold plate, filled, and rolled products.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who or that makes for sale or sells, or offers to sell or dispose of, or has in his, her, or its possession with intent to sell or dispose of, any article of merchandise made in whole or in part of inferior metal having deposited or plated on the article or brazed or otherwise affixed to it a plate, plating, covering, or sheet of gold or of any alloy of gold, and the article is known in the market as “rolled gold plate”, “gold plate”, “gold filled”, or “gold electroplate”, or by any similar designation, and having stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon any part of the article, or upon any tag, card, or label attached to it, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed, any word or mark usually employed to indicate the fineness of gold, unless that word is accompanied by other words plainly indicating that the article or some part of the article is made of rolled gold plate, or gold plate or gold electroplate, or is gold filled, as the case may be, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1454, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 199, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 226, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 399, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

6-11-2

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 7.

6-11-3.
Sterling silver.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who or that makes for sale or sells, or offers to sell or dispose of, or has in his, her, or its possession with intent to sell or dispose of, any article of merchandise made in whole or in part of silver or of any alloy of silver, and having marked, stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon any part of the article, or upon any tag, card, or label attached to it, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed, the words “sterling silver” or “sterling,” or any colorable imitation thereof, unless nine hundred twenty-five one-thousandths (925/1000) of the component parts of the metal appearing or purporting to be silver of which the article is manufactured are pure silver, subject to the qualifications prescribed by this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, that in the case of all articles, there shall be allowed a divergence in fineness of four one-thousandths (4/1000) parts from the previously mentioned standard.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1454, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 199, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 226, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 399, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-11-3

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 7.

6-11-4.
Coin silver.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who or that makes for sale or sells, or offers to sell, or dispose of, or has in his, her, or its possession with intent to sell or dispose of, any article of merchandise made in whole or in part of silver or of any alloy of silver, and having marked, stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon any part of the article, or upon any tag, card, or label attached to it, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed, the words “coin” or “coin silver,” or any colorable imitation thereof, unless nine hundred one-thousandths (900/1000) of the component parts of the metal appearing or purporting to be silver of which the article is manufactured are pure silver, subject to the qualifications prescribed by this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, that in the case of all articles, there shall be allowed a divergence in fineness of four one-thousands (4/1000) parts from the previously mentioned standards.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1454, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 199, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 226, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 399, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

6-11-4

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 7.

6-11-5.
Labeling as to fineness of silver products.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who or that makes for sale or sells, or offers to sell, or dispose of, or has in his, her, or its possession with intent to sell or dispose of, any article of merchandise made in whole or in part of silver or of any alloy of silver, and having stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon any part of the article, or upon any tag, card, or label attached to it, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed, any mark or word (other than the word “sterling” or the word “coin”) indicating, or designed or intended to indicate, that the silver or alloy of silver in the article is of greater degree of fineness than the actual fineness or quality of the silver or alloy, unless the actual fineness of the silver or alloy of silver of which the article is composed is not less by more than four one-thousandths (4/1000) parts than the actual fineness indicated by the mark or word (other than the word “sterling” or “coin”) stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon any part of the article or upon any tag, card, or label attached to it, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed, subject to the qualifications prescribed in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1454, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 199, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 226, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 399, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

6-11-5

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 7.

6-11-6.
Testing of silver products — Brazing and uniting alloys.

In any test for the ascertainment of the fineness of any article mentioned in §§

6-11-3

—

6-11-5

according to the previously mentioned standards, the part of the article taken for the test, analysis, or assay shall be a part or portion that does not contain or have attached to it any solder or alloy of inferior metal used for brazing or uniting the parts of the article; provided, that in addition to the previously mentioned test and standards, the actual fineness of the entire quantity of metal purporting to be silver contained in any article mentioned in §§

6-11-3

—

6-11-5

including all solder or alloy of inferior fineness used for brazing or uniting the parts of any article (all silver, alloy, or solder being assayed as one piece), shall not be less by more than ten one-thousandths (10/1000) parts than the fineness indicated, according to the previously mentioned standards, by the mark stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon the article, or upon any tag, card, or label attached to it, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1454, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 199, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 226, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 399, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

6-11-6

.

6-11-7.
Labeling of silver plated products as sterling or coin silver.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who or that makes for sale or sells, or offers to sell or dispose of, or has in his, her, or its possession with intent to sell or dispose of, any article of merchandise made in whole or in part of inferior metal having deposited or plated on it or brazed or otherwise affixed to it a plate, plating, covering, or sheet of silver or of any alloy of silver, and which article is known in the market as “silver plate” or “silver electroplate”, or by any similar designation, and having stamped, branded, engraved, or imprinted upon any part of the article, or upon any tag, card, or label attached to it, or upon any box, package, cover, or wrapper in which the article is encased or enclosed, the word, “sterling” or the word “coin”, either alone or in conjunction with any other words or marks, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1454, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 199, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 226, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 399, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

6-11-7

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 7.

6-11-8.
Penalty for violations — Previously manufactured articles.

Every person, firm, corporation, or association guilty of a violation of any one of §§

6-11-1

—

6-11-7

and every officer, manager, director, or managing agent of any person, firm, corporation, or association directly participating in the violation or consenting to it, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not more than three (3) months, or both, at the discretion of the court; provided, that if the person charged with violation of this chapter shall prove that the article concerning which the charge is made was manufactured prior to the thirteenth day of June, 1907, then the charge shall be dismissed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1454, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 199, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 226, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 399, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

6-11-8

.